Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-129] Crossing fire hose. No
vehicle shall be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department when
laid down on any street, private road, or driveway, to be used at any fire or
alarm of fire, without the consent of the fire department official in command.
[L 1971, c 150, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next